Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4726
Taxes.

The same taxes provided for in section 44-32,180 shall be imposed upon each prepaid limited health service organization, and such organizations also shall be entitled to the same tax deductions, reductions, abatements, and credits that health maintenance organizations are entitled to receive.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 26;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 110;

Laws 1996, LB 969, § 8;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 9, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 64;

Laws 2010, LB698, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB527, § 10.